Florida, session 2026, SB1488.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âChild Protection 14 at Time of Parental Arrest Act.â 15 Section 2.âSection 901.45, Florida Statutes, is created to 16 read: 17 901.45âBooking officer duties related to minor children of 18 arrested persons.â 19 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 20 (a)ââGuardianâ means a parent, relative, caregiver, or 21 other person legally designated by a court to be responsible for 22 the safety and welfare of a minor child. 23 (b)ââMinor childâ means an unmarried person under the age 24 of 18 years who has not been emancipated by order of the court 25 and who is the legal or biological child of an arrested person. 26 (2)âIn addition to any other duty, whenever a booking 27 officer is committing an arrested person to custody, the booking 28 officer must ask the arrested person if he or she has a minor 29 child. 30 (3)âIf the arrested person states that he or she has a 31 minor child, the booking officer must ask the person, in the 32 same or similar wording, the following questions, and take the 33 following actions: 34 (a)âIs the minor child safe with a responsible guardian? 35 (b)âDo I need to contact someone to confirm the care of the 36 minor child? 37 (c)âVerify the minor childâs safety and current placement 38 or location. 39 (d)âNotify the central abuse hotline, if the booking 40 officer determines that the minor child is unprotected and at 41 risk of or vulnerable to abuse, abandonment, or neglect, or is 42 without a responsible guardian. 43 (4)âIf the arrested person states that he or she does not 44 have a minor child, but a previous arrest record states that a 45 minor child lives with the person, the booking officer may 46 contact the central abuse hotline and request an immediate 47 protective investigation. 48 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.